Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7938. HARRIS COUNTY WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT NO. 110

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7938.0101. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Harris County Water Control and Improvement District No. 110.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (S.B. 1250), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7938.0201. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE CERTIFICATES OF COMPLIANCE FOR STORMWATER DETENTION FACILITIES. (a) The district may implement a program to require and issue an annual written certificate of compliance to the owner or operator of a stormwater detention facility within the boundaries of the district to ensure that each stormwater detention facility is operating to abate flooding as designed and approved by the applicable regulatory authority.

(b) The district may assess reasonable charges and fees for the implementation, administration, and enforcement of this section.

(c) The district may impose a fine or penalty on the owner or operator of a stormwater detention facility for the failure to hold a certificate of compliance as required by the district under this section.

(d) This section does not apply to a stormwater detention facility that is owned or operated by a public entity other than the district or that operates under a permit held by a public entity other than the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 353 (S.B. 1250), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2023.